Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5648.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-19-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-19 entitled "Sentence and
Execution" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-19-2. Selection of method and amount or term of punishment.
(a) Whenever it is provided that any offense shall be punished by a fine or imprisonment,
the court imposing punishment may, in its discretion, select the kind of punishment to be imposed,
and, if the punishment is fine or imprisonment, its amount or term within the limits prescribed by
law; provided, if the punishment to be imposed is imprisonment, the sentence or sentences imposed
shall be reduced by the number of days spent in confinement while awaiting trial and while awaiting
sentencing; and provided, further, that in the case of a person sentenced to a life sentence, the time
at which he or she shall become eligible to apply for parole shall be reduced by the number of days
spent in confinement while awaiting trial and while awaiting sentencing; and any sentence or
sentences in effect at present, including the provision as to a life sentence as described in this
subsection may be reduced in like manner by the court which imposed the sentence upon
application by the person serving the sentence to the court.
(b) The court upon the sentencing of a first-time offender, excluding capital offense and
sex offense involving minors, may in appropriate cases sentence the person to a term of
imprisonment, and allow the person to continue in his or her usual occupation or education and
shall order the person to be confined in a minimum security facility at the A.C.I. during his or her
nonworking or study hours.

(c) The court, in imposing a sentence upon any person, shall make a finding as to whether
the defendant is the parent of a child or infant or caregiver of an elderly, disabled or terminally ill
family member whose well-being will be negatively affected by the parent’s or caregiver’s absence,
and if so, shall consider the following circumstances in assessing the appropriateness of any
sentence imposed:
(1) That the parent is breastfeeding the child;
(2) The age of the child, with strong consideration given to avoiding disruption of the
caregiving of an infant, pre-school or school-age child by the parent; or age of the elderly, disabled
or terminally ill family member;
(3) The role of the parent or caregiver in the day-to-day educational and medical needs of
the child or elderly, disabled or terminally ill family member;
(4) The relationship of the parent and child or caregiver and elderly, disabled, or terminally
ill family member;
(5) Any special, medical, educational, or psychological needs of the child or elderly,
disabled, or terminally ill family member; and
(6) The role of the parent or caregiver in the financial support of the child or elderly,
disabled, or terminally ill family member.
(d) The court shall permit the defendant to present a family impact statement at sentencing
which the court shall consider prior to imposing any sentence. The impact statement may include
testimony from family and community members, written statements, videos and other
documentation. Unless the court finds that the parent poses a significant risk to the community that
outweighs the risk of harm to the defendant’s child by the parent's removal, or caregiver’s removal
from the family, the court shall impose a sentence of probation, a suspended sentence or home
confinement if determined necessary, which allows the parent or caregiver to continue to care for
their child or children, or elderly, disabled, or terminally ill family member.
(c)(e) The director of corrections or his or her designee may impose any conditions and
restrictions upon the release of persons sentenced under this section that he or she deems necessary.
(d)(f) The director of corrections may at any time, subject to the approval of the director,
recall a prisoner from release status if he or she believes or has reason to believe the peace, safety,
welfare, or security of the community may be endangered by the prisoner being under release status.
Any prisoner recalled under this subsection shall be presented to the next regularly scheduled
meeting of the classification board for its further consideration.
(e)(g) A prisoner authorized to work at paid employment in the community under this
section may be required to pay, and the director is authorized to collect, costs incident to the
LC001596 - Page 2 of 4

prisoner’s confinement as the director deems appropriate and reasonable. These collections shall
be deposited with the treasurer as a part of the general revenue of the state.
(f)(h) When a sentenced inmate’s parole release date or completion of sentence falls on a
weekend or on a holiday, the department of corrections may release the inmate on the prior business
day.
(g)(i) When a sentenced inmate is scheduled to be released from the custody of the
department of corrections to a community partner for residential treatment and/or to a facility to
maintain stable living conditions, and the inmate’s release date or completion of sentence is
incompatible with the capacity, staffing, or scheduling capabilities of the community partner
facility, the department of corrections may release the inmate up to three (3) business days earlier
than the scheduled release date, provided the inmate transitions directly from the department of
corrections to the community partner facility.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001596
========
LC001596 - Page 3 of 4